California statutes. Water Code
The board, subject to the provisions of Section 100 and whenever it is in the public interest, may approve appropriation by storage of water to be released for the purpose of protecting or enhancing the quality of other waters which are put to beneficial uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

1243.

(a) The use of water for recreation and preservation and enhancement of fish and wildlife resources is a beneficial use of water. In determining the amount of water available for appropriation for other beneficial uses, the board shall take into account, when it is in the public interest, the amounts of water required for recreation and the preservation and enhancement of fish and wildlife resources.

(b) The board shall notify the Department of Fish and Wildlife of an application for a permit to appropriate water. The Department of Fish and Wildlife shall recommend the amounts of water, if any, required for the preservation and enhancement of fish and wildlife resources and shall
 report its findings to the board.

(c) This section does not affect riparian rights.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 51.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1243.5.

In determining the amount of water available for appropriation, the board shall take into account, whenever it is in the public interest, the amounts of water needed to remain in the source for protection of beneficial uses, including any uses specified to be protected in any relevant water quality control plan established pursuant to Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of this code.

This section shall not be construed to affect riparian rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

1244.

The sale, lease, exchange, or transfer of water or water rights, in itself, shall not constitute evidence of waste or unreasonable use, unreasonable method of use, or unreasonable method of diversion and shall not affect any determination of forfeiture applicable to water appropriated pursuant to the Water Commmission Act or this code or water appropriated prior to December 19, 1914.

This section does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 933, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Liability Within a Watershed [1245. - 1248.]

1245.

Every municipal corporation of this State, and every person, firm or corporation engaged in supplying water to any municipal corporations for municipal, domestic or other uses, who enters any watershed, or any lands, streams or waters in the watershed for the purpose of acquiring or increasing a water supply for such purpose, or for the purpose of taking, diverting or transporting water for use by or in a municipal corporation, or for the purpose of supplying the needs of any municipal corporation, or its inhabitants, with water for the enumerated uses, shall be liable to all persons, firms and corporations, their heirs, representatives and successors, and to municipal corporations, districts and political subdivisions of this State whose property, business, trade, profession or occupation is within or conducted or carried on within the watershed entered, for all damage suffered or sustained by them either directly or indirectly because of injury, damage, destruction or decrease in value of any such property, business, trade, profession or occupation resulting from or caused by the taking of any such lands or waters, or by the taking, diverting or transporting of water from such watershed to and for use by or in any such municipal corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

1246.

For the purpose of ascertaining the amount of any damage claimed to have been suffered or sustained by reason of any of the acts or things mentioned in Section 1245, every municipal corporation and every person, firm or corporation causing any such damage, is authorized to enter into an agreement for the arbitration or compromise of any claims, and all of the laws of this State relating to arbitration of controversies are made applicable to such claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

1247.

Nothing in this article shall confer the right to recover damages resulting directly or indirectly by reason of the construction, operation or maintenance of any conduit, pipe line, canal, ditch, aqueduct, reservoir, power transmission line or power house.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

1248.

This article shall be liberally construed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 49.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Applications to Appropriate Water [1250. - 1276.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1250. - 1259.6.]

1250.

The board shall consider and act upon all applications for permits to appropriate water and shall do all things required or proper relating to such applications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.5.

The board shall consider and act upon all applications for permits to appropriate water which propose, as a primary purpose of the application, the development of small hydroelectric energy facilities at an existing dam, canal, or conduit, up to and including 30 megawatts, or the development of any other hydroelectric facility with a generating capacity of five megawatts or less, within one year from the date a complete application and an instream beneficial use assessment have been filed with the board, except that the assessment need not be filed if the streamflow regime will not be changed, and except that final board action may be continued for a reasonable time not to exceed one year upon the request of the applicant or upon a finding by the board that the additional time is necessary to determine (1) if unappropriated water is available or (2) the effect upon instream uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1482, Sec. 2.   Effective September 28, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

1251.

The board shall make such investigations of the water resources of the State as may be necessary for the purpose of securing information needed in connection with applications for appropriations of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1252.

Any person may apply for and secure from the board, in conformity with this part and in conformity with reasonable rules and regulations adopted from time to time by it, a permit for any unappropriated water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1252.1.

An appropriation of water of any stream or other source of water under this part does not confer authority upon the appropriator to prevent or interfere with soil conservation practices above the point of diversion in the watershed in which such stream or other source originates, which practices do not themselves constitute an appropriation for which a permit is required by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1378.)
-------------------------------------------

1252.5.

All rights and privileges conferred by this part upon any person in relation to the appropriation of water are likewise conferred upon the United States, the State, and any entity or organization capable of holding an interest in real property in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 423.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.

The board shall allow the appropriation for beneficial purposes of unappropriated water under such terms and conditions as in its judgment will best develop, conserve, and utilize in the public interest the water sought to be appropriated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1254.

In acting upon applications to appropriate water the board shall be guided by the policy that domestic use is the highest use and irrigation is the next highest use of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1255.

The board shall reject an application when in its judgment the proposed appropriation would not best conserve the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1256.

In determining public interest under Sections 1253 and 1255, the board shall give consideration to any general or co-ordinated plan looking toward the control, protection, development, utilization, and conservation of the water resources of the State, including The California Water Plan, prepared and published by the Department of Water Resources or any predecessor thereof and any modification thereto as may be adopted by the department or as may be adopted by the Legislature by concurrent resolution or by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2053.)
-------------------------------------------

1257.

In acting upon application to appropriate water, the board shall consider the relative benefit to be derived from (1) all beneficial uses of the water concerned including, but not limited to, use for domestic, irrigation, municipal, industrial, preservation and enhancement of fish and wildlife, recreational, mining and power purposes, and any uses specified to be protected in any relevant water quality control plan, and (2) the reuse or reclamation of the water sought to be appropriated, as proposed by the applicant. The board may subject such appropriations to such terms and conditions as in its judgment will best develop, conserve, and utilize in the public interest, the water sought to be appropriated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 157.)
-------------------------------------------

1257.5.

The board, in acting on applications to appropriate water, shall consider streamflow requirements proposed for fish and wildlife purposes pursuant to Sections 10001 and 10002 of the Public Resources Code. The board may establish such streamflow requirements as it deems necessary to protect fish and wildlife as conditions in permits and licenses in accordance with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1259, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1258.

In acting upon applications to appropriate water, the board shall consider water quality control plans which have been established pursuant to Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of this code, and may subject such appropriations to such terms and conditions as it finds are necessary to carry out such plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

1259.

In acting upon applications to appropriate water, the board shall consider the state goal of providing a decent home and suitable living environment for every Californian.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 947.)
-------------------------------------------

1259.2.

(a) The board shall annually prepare a written summary, in chart form, of pending applications to appropriate water in the Counties of Marin, Napa, Sonoma, Mendocino, and Humboldt. The summary shall include a description of the status of each pending application, the actions taken in the preceding year, proposed actions for the upcoming year, and the proposed date for final action with regard to that application.

(b) For the purposes of carrying out subdivision (a), the board may post the information described in subdivision (a) on its Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 943, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1259.4.

(a) (1) On or before January 1, 2008, the board shall adopt principles and guidelines for maintaining instream flows in coastal streams from the Mattole River to San Francisco and in coastal streams entering northern San Pablo Bay, as part of state policy for water quality control adopted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 13140) of Chapter 3 of Division 7, for the purposes of water right administration.

(2) The board may adopt principles and guidelines for maintaining instream flows not described in paragraph (1), as part of state policy for water quality control adopted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 13140) of Chapter 3 of Division 7, for the purposes of water right administration.

(b) Prior to the adoption of principles and guidelines pursuant to subdivision (a), the board may consider the 2002 “Guidelines for Maintaining Instream Flows to Protect Fisheries Resources Downstream of Water Diversions in Mid-California Coastal Streams” for the purposes of water right administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 81, Sec. 7.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1259.6.

(a) (1) The board shall develop and adopt regulations to govern consideration of climate change effects in water availability analyses used in the board’s review of applications for water rights permits. The board, in developing and adopting the regulations, shall consider the effects of climate change upon watershed hydrology. The effects considered shall include, but are not limited to, drought extremes, floods, and groundwater-surface water interactions.

(2) This section does not limit any authority held by the board under this code or any other law, including, but not limited to, the authority of the board to require applicants for water right permits to submit information pursuant to Section 1260 or
 1275.

(3) In developing the regulations, the board shall consider the feasibility of accurately assessing the effects of climate change on watershed hydrology.

(b) In preparing the regulations pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall consult with the Department of Water Resources, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, qualified hydrologists and climate change scientists, potential applicants, and other interested parties.

(c) This section does not limit the board’s authority to accept or process applications before the regulations required under this section are adopted.
 The board shall not refuse to accept or delay processing or approval of an application on the grounds that the regulations have not yet been adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 369, Sec. 1.   (SB 1205)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contents of Applications [1260. - 1266.]

1260.

An application for a permit to appropriate water shall set forth all of the following:

(a) The name and post office address of the applicant.

(b) The source of water supply.

(c) The nature and amount of the proposed use.

(d) The location and description of the proposed headworks, ditch canal, and other works.

(e) The proposed place of diversion.

(f) The place where it is intended to use
 the water.

(g) The time within which it is proposed to begin construction.

(h) The time required for completion of the construction.

(i) The time for the complete application of the water to the proposed use.

(j) All data and information reasonably available to applicant or that can be obtained from the Department of Fish and Wildlife concerning the extent, if any, to which fish and wildlife would be affected by the appropriation, and a statement of any measures proposed to be taken for the protection of fish and wildlife in connection with the appropriation.

(k) Sufficient information to demonstrate a reasonable likelihood that unappropriated water is available for the proposed
 appropriation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 52.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1261.

All applications shall be accompanied by as many copies of such maps, drawings, and other data as may be prescribed or required by the board, and such maps, drawings, and other data are part of the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1262.

If for agricultural purposes the application shall give the legal subdivisions of the land and the acreage to be irrigated, as near as may be.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.

If for power purposes the application shall state the nature of the works by means of which the power is to be developed, the head and amount of water to be utilized, and the use to which the power is to be applied.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1264.

If for municipal water supply the application shall state the present population to be served, and, as near as may be, the future requirements of the city.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1265.

If for mining purposes the application shall state the nature and location of the mines to be served and the methods of supplying and utilizing the water.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1266.

If for storage in a reservoir the application shall state the height of dam, the capacity of reservoir, and the use to be made of the impounded waters, except that for storage underground these additional requirements as to height of dam and capacity of reservoir shall be given as near as may be.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Defective Applications [1270. - 1271.]

1270.

A defective application made in a bona fide attempt to conform to the rules and regulations of the board and to the law secures to the applicant a priority of right as of the date of the application until he or she is notified in what respect his application is defective, and the applicant shall be allowed 60 days after notice of the defect, or any additional period of time that the board agrees to, in which to file an amended and perfected application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 323, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1270.5.

The board, by January 1, 2025, shall update its online search tool for funding applications to include, at a minimum, all of the following information:

(a) A description of the additional information the board requires from a water system to continue processing the water system’s application.

(b) The date the board
 requested the water system to provide additional information.

(c) The cause of any prolonged delays in the process.

(d) A description of the typical steps that must be completed before a funding agreement can be executed after receipt of a complete application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 340, Sec. 1.   (AB 682)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1271.

If, within the period provided, the applicant does not file an amended and perfected application, the application shall be rejected and canceled, unless for good cause shown the board allows the applicant to file a further amended and perfected application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 323, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Supplemental Information [1275. - 1276.]

1275.

After an application has been perfected, the board may request additional information reasonably necessary to clarify, amplify, correct, or otherwise supplement the information required to be submitted under Article 2 (commencing with Section 1260) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 1270). The board shall provide a reasonable period for submitting the information. The additional information may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(a) Information needed to demonstrate that unappropriated water is available for appropriation.

(b) Information needed to comply, or demonstrate compliance with, any applicable requirements of the Fish and Game Code or the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.).

(c) Information needed to comply with Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 323, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1276.

If, within the period provided, the applicant does not provide the information requested under Section 1275, the application shall be canceled, unless for good cause shown the board allows additional time in which to submit the requested information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 323, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Notice of Application [1300. - 1324.]



  ARTICLE 1. Contents of Notice [1300. - 1304.]

1300.

As soon as practicable after the receipt of an application for a permit to appropriate water which conforms to the rules and regulations of the board and to law, the board shall issue and deliver a notice of the application (a) to the applicant, (b) to the district attorney of each county wherein the applicant proposes to divert water under the application, and (c) to the board of supervisors of each county wherein the applicant proposes to divert water under the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 45.)
-------------------------------------------

1301.

The notice shall specify all of the following:

(a) The number of the application.

(b) The name and address of the applicant.

(c) The date of filing.

(d) The source of supply.

(e) The amount applied for.

(f) The season of diversion.

(g) The location of the point of diversion.

(h) The use to be made.

(i) The location of the place of use.

(j) The date of issuance of the notice.

(k) Such other information as the board deems necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1302.

If the application is for more than three cubic feet per second or for more than 200 acre-feet per annum of storage, the notice shall state that protests against the approval of the application may be filed within 60 days from the date of issuance of the notice or within such further time as the board may, for good cause shown, allow.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1303.

If the application is for three cubic feet or less per second, or for 200 acre-feet or less per annum of storage, the notice shall state that protests may be filed within 40 days from date thereof or within such further time as the board may, for good cause shown, allow.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1304.

The notice shall contain appropriate general information as to what protests against the approval of the application shall contain in order to accord with the requirements of law and the rules and regulations of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Publication of Notice [1310. - 1317.]

1310.

If the application is for more than three cubic feet per second or for more than 200 acre-feet per annum of storage the notice of application shall be published in accordance with this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1311.

Upon receipt of notice of an application coming under this article, the applicant shall cause it to be published as directed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1312.

The notice shall be published at the expense of the applicant at least once a week for three consecutive weeks, commencing within 20 days of the date of issuance of the notice, in a newspaper having a general circulation and published within the county wherein the point of diversion lies, or, if there are points of diversion in more than one county, in each county in which a point of diversion lies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 773.)
-------------------------------------------

1313.

In case there is no newspaper published within the appropriate county publication shall be made in a newspaper having a general circulation within the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1315.

Proof of publication shall be filed by the applicant within 60 days from the date of issuance of the notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1316.

Proof of publication shall be by copy of the notice as published attached to and made a part of the affidavit of the publisher or foreman of the newspaper publishing the notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1317.

The board may cancel any application for failure of the applicant to file proof of publication in accordance with this article, provided the board first gives the applicant written notice of such possible cancellation and 15 days in which to file proof of publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Posting and Mailing Notice [1320. - 1324.]

1320.

Notice of an application for three cubic feet or less per second or for 200 acre-feet or less per annum of storage shall be given by posting and mailing in accordance with this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1321.

Upon the date of issuance of notice of an application coming under this article the board shall mail three copies of the notice to the applicant by registered mail and shall also send a copy by registered mail to each person who is known to the board and who in its judgment is interested in the application because of ownership or location in the vicinity of the proposed appropriation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1322.

The applicant shall post the notice within 20 days of the date of issuance thereof in at least two conspicuous places in the locality to be affected by the proposed appropriation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 773.)
-------------------------------------------

1323.

Proof of posting shall be by affidavit of the applicant or the person posting notice on behalf of the applicant and shall be filed within 40 days from the date of issuance of notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1324.

The board may cancel any application for failure of the applicant to file proof of posting in accordance with this article, provided the board first gives the applicant written notice of such possible cancellation and 15 days in which to file proof of posting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Protest of Application [1330. - 1335.]

1330.

Any person interested may, within the time allowed in the notice of application or within such further time as may, for good cause shown, be allowed by the board, file with it a written protest against the approval of an application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1331.

The protest shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) State the name and address of the protestant.

(b) Be signed by the protestant, or the protestant’s agent or attorney.

(c) Clearly and specifically set forth the protestant’s objections to the approval of the application, and state the bases for these objections.

(d) Contain other appropriate information and be in the form provided in the rules and regulations of the board.

(e) Be served on the applicant by the protestant by mailing a duplicate copy of the protest to the applicant or through service undertaken in another manner determined to be adequate by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 323, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1332.

The board may request from the protestant additional information reasonably necessary to clarify, amplify, correct, or otherwise supplement the information required to be submitted under Section 1331. The board shall provide a reasonable period for submitting the information, and may allow additional time for good cause shown.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 323, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1333.

The protestant and the applicant shall make a good faith effort to resolve the protest within 180 days from the date on which the period provided under Section 1330 expires. For good cause, the board may allow additional time for the protestant and the applicant to attempt to resolve the protest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 323, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1334.

The board may request from the protestant or the applicant additional information that the board determines is reasonably necessary to attempt to resolve the protest. The board shall provide a reasonable period for submitting the information, and may allow additional time for good cause shown.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 323, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1335.

(a) The board may cancel a protest or application for failure to provide information requested by the board under this article within the period provided.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), a protest shall not be canceled for failure to submit information not in the possession or under the control of the protestant if the protest is in compliance with Section 1331 and the applicant is or could be required to submit the information under Section 1260 or 1275.

(c) If a protest is based on interference with a prior right, the board may cancel the protest if the protestant fails to submit any of the following information requested by the board:

(1) Information that the protestant is required to submit to the board to comply with Part 5.1 (commencing with Section 5100) during any period after the protest is filed.

(2) Information that is reasonably necessary to determine if the protestant has a valid water right.

(3) Information concerning the protestant’s historical, current, or proposed future diversion and use of water that is reasonably necessary to determine if the proposed appropriation will result in injury to the protestant’s exercise of its water right.

(d) If the protest is based on an allegation that the proposed appropriation would not be in the public interest, would adversely affect public trust uses, or would have adverse environmental impact, the board may cancel the protest for failure to submit information requested by the board if the board determines both of the following:

(1) The public review period has expired for any draft environmental document or negative declaration required to be circulated for public review and comment pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(2) In the absence of the requested information, there is no substantial evidence in light of the whole record to support the allegation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 323, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Proceedings on Application [1340. - 1353.]



  ARTICLE 1. Notice of Hearing [1340. - 1342.]

1340.

Notice of hearing on a protested application shall be given by mailing notice not less than 20 days before the date of hearing to both the applicant and protestant by registered mail.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1341.

The notice of hearing on a protested application shall state the names of the applicant and protestant, the time and place fixed for the hearing, and such other appropriate information as may be deemed advisable by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1342.

If a hearing is held on an unprotested application, notice of hearing shall be given by mailing notice not less than 20 days before the date of hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Minor Protested Applications Procedure [1345. - 1348.]

1345.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the Division of Water Rights shall conduct a field investigation of all minor protested applications. The board shall notify the parties of the field investigation not less than 20 days prior to conducting the field investigation, to enable the parties to attend and present information to the board.

(b) The Division of Water Rights is not required to conduct a field investigation for an application defined as a minor application under subdivision (b) of Section 1348 if the Division of Water Rights determines, in its discretion, that a field investigation will not substantially expedite consideration of the
 application and a hearing should be conducted under Section 183. If the Division of Water Rights makes that determination, Sections 1346 and 1347 do not apply to the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 2.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1346.

The Division of Water Rights may request the parties to submit information in support of their positions. The Division of Water Rights may request information before, during, or after the field investigation. After the field investigation, the Division of Water Rights may conduct additional proceedings in accordance with Article 10 (commencing with Section 11445.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 323, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1347.

Based upon the field investigation and any other information obtained under this article, the Division of Water Rights shall issue a decision unless the board in its discretion determines that additional proceedings should be conducted under Section 183. A decision of the Division of Water Rights is subject to review as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1120) of Part 1.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 323, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1348.

For purposes of this article, a minor application shall mean either of the following:

(a) Any application which does not involve direct diversions in excess of three cubic-feet per second or storage in excess of 200 acre-feet per year.

(b) An application by a groundwater sustainability agency or local agency, as defined in Section 10721, for a diversion previously authorized by a temporary permit under Article 2 (commencing with Section 1433) of Chapter 6.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 3.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Action on Application [1350. - 1353.]

1350.

The board may grant, or refuse to grant a permit and may reject any application, after hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1351.

No hearing is necessary in order to issue a permit upon an unprotested application, or if undisputed facts support the issuance of the permit and there is no disputed issue of material fact, unless the board elects to hold a hearing. No hearing is necessary to reject an application after notice, if the application is defective, the applicant fails to provide information requested by the board, or undisputed facts support the denial of the application and there is no disputed issue of material fact, unless the board elects to hold a hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 323, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1352.

Upon failure of any party in interest to appear at a hearing or show good cause within five days thereafter for his failure, final action may be taken without further hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1353.

In the conduct of hearings technical rules of evidence need not be applied.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Permits [1375. - 1410.2.]



  ARTICLE 1. Prerequisites to Issuance of Permit [1375. - 1375.]

1375.

As prerequisite to the issuance of a permit to appropriate water the following facts must exist:

(a) There must be an applicant.

(b) The application must contain the matter and information prescribed by this division and be in the form required by the board.

(c) The intended use must be beneficial.

(d) There must be unappropriated water available to supply the applicant.

(e) All fees due must be paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Issuance of Permit [1380. - 1382.]

1380.

Upon the approval of an application the board shall issue a permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1381.

The issuance of a permit gives the right to take and use water only to the extent and for the purpose allowed in the permit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1382.

All permits shall be under the terms and conditions of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Permit Terms and Conditions [1390. - 1394.]

1390.

A permit shall be effective for such time as the water actually appropriated under it is used for a useful and beneficial purpose in conformity with this division, but no longer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1391.

Every permit shall include the enumeration of conditions therein which in substance shall include all of the provisons of this article and the statement that any appropriator of water to whom a permit is issued takes it subject to the conditions therein expressed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1392.

Every permittee, if he accepts a permit, does so under the conditions precedent that no value whatsoever in excess of the actual amount paid to the State therefor shall at any time be assigned to or claimed for any permit granted or issued under the provisions of this division, or for any rights granted or acquired under the provisions of this division, in respect to the regulation by any competent public authority of the services or the price of the services to be rendered by any permittee or by the holder of any rights granted or acquired under the provisions of this division or in respect to any valuation for purposes of sale to or purchase, whether through condemnation proceedings or otherwise, by the State or any city, city and county, municipal water district, irrigation district, lighting district, or any political subdivision of the State, of the rights and property of any permittee, or the possessor of any rights granted, issued, or acquired under the provisions of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1393.
